Washington statutes.
RCW 19.158.040

Unprofessional conduct.

In addition to the unprofessional conduct described in RCW 18.235.130, the director of the department of licensing may take disciplinary action for any of the following conduct, acts, or conditions:

(1) It shall be unlawful for any person to engage in unfair or deceptive commercial telephone solicitation.

(2) A commercial telephone solicitor shall not place calls to any person which will be received before 8:00 a.m. or after 8:00 p.m. at the call recipient's local time.

(3) A commercial telephone solicitor may not engage in any conduct the natural consequence of which is to harass, intimidate, or torment any person in connection with the telephone call.

(4) A person making a telephone solicitation must identify him [himself] or herself and the company or organization on whose behalf the solicitation is being made and the purpose of the call within the first 30 seconds of the telephone call.

(5) A commercial telephone solicitor must end a call within 10 seconds if the called party states or indicates they want to end the call.

(6) A commercial telephone solicitor must promptly implement a call recipient's statement or indication they do not want to be called again, or want to be removed from the telephone lists used by the company or organization making the telephone solicitation.

[ 2022 c 195 s 2; 2002 c 86 s 284; 1989 c 20 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.